Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act [Repealed]

4-17-401. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 1; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-402. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-403. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 3; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-404. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 4; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-405. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 5; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-406. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-407. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 7; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-408. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 8; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-409. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 9; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-410. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 10; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-411. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 11; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-412. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 12; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-413. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 13; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-414. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 14; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.

4-17-415. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 443, § 15; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§4-17-401 —4-17-415, concerned the Tennessee Industrial Finance Corporation Act.